Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202570-1001.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1028.02, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Board means the Nebraska Power Review Board;

(2) Commercial electric vehicle charging station means equipment designed to provide electricity for a fee for the charging of an electric vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, including an electric vehicle direct-current charger or a super-fast charger, any successor technology, and all components thereof. Commercial electric vehicle charging station does not include the residence of a person where an electric vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle is charged if no customer usage fee is charged;

(3) Commercial electric vehicle charging station operator means a person, partnership, corporation, or other business entity or political subdivision that operates a commercial electric vehicle charging station;

(4) Direct-current, fast-charging station means a publicly available charging system capable of delivering at least fifty kilowatts of direct-current electrical power to an electric vehicle's rechargeable battery at a voltage of two hundred volts or greater;

(5) Direct-current, fast-charging station operator means a person, partnership, corporation, or other business entity that operates a direct-current, fast-charging station open to the public. The term does not include an electric supplier or a political subdivision;

(6) Electric supplier or supplier of electricity means any legal entity supplying, producing, or distributing electricity within the state for sale at wholesale or retail. Electric supplier does not include a commercial electric vehicle charging station operator that is a private person or privately owned partnership, privately owned corporation, or other privately owned business;

(7) Electronic-related means relating to electronic devices, circuits, or similar systems, or the components of such electronic devices, circuits, or similar systems, that require electrical currents or electromagnetism to operate;

(8) Foreign adversary means a foreign government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on February 7, 2025;

(9) Military installation means:

(a) A United States Air Force ballistic missile silo located within the geographic area described in 31 C.F.R. 802.211(b)(3), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025; or

(b) A United States Air Force base described in 31 C.F.R. 802.227(c), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;

(10) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle has the same meaning as in section 60-345.01;

(11) Private electric supplier means an electric supplier producing electricity from a privately developed renewable energy generation facility that is not a public power district, a public power and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof. A private electric supplier is limited to the development of those facilities as provided in subdivision (12) of this section;

(12) Privately developed renewable energy generation facility means and is limited to a facility that (a) generates electricity using solar, wind, geothermal, biomass, landfill gas, or biogas, including all electrically connected equipment used to produce, collect, and store the facility output up to and including the transformer that steps up the voltage to sixty thousand volts or greater, and including supporting structures, buildings, and roads, unless otherwise agreed to in a joint transmission development agreement, (b) is developed, constructed, and owned, in whole or in part, by one or more private electric suppliers, and (c) is not wholly owned by a public power district, a public power and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof;

(13) Regional transmission organization means an entity independent from those entities generating or marketing electricity at wholesale or retail, which has operational control over the electric transmission lines in a designated geographic area in order to reduce constraints in the flow of electricity and ensure that all power suppliers have open access to transmission lines for the transmission of electricity;

(14) Reliable or reliability means the ability of an electric supplier to supply the aggregate electric power and energy requirements of its electricity consumers in Nebraska at all times under normal operating conditions, taking into account scheduled and unscheduled outages, including sudden disturbances or unanticipated loss of system components that are to be reasonably expected for any electric utility following prudent utility practices, recognizing certain weather conditions and other contingencies may cause outages at the distribution, transmission, and generation level;

(15) Representative organization means an organization designated by the board and organized for the purpose of providing joint planning and encouraging maximum cooperation and coordination among electric suppliers. Such organization shall represent electric suppliers owning a combined electric generation plant accredited capacity of at least ninety percent of the total electric generation plant accredited capacity constructed and in operation within the state;

(16) State means the State of Nebraska; and

(17) Unbundled retail rates means the separation of utility bills into the individual price components for which an electric supplier charges its retail customers, including, but not limited to, the separate charges for the generation, transmission, and distribution of electricity.

Laws 1981, LB 302, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 70-1023;

Laws 2000, LB 901, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 65, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB1048, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB208, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB824, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB565, § 44;

Laws 2024, LB399, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 65;

Laws 2024, LB1370, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB43, § 1.